Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2612
Sales of swine; violation; penalty.

Any packer acting in violation of section 54-2607 is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and shall be fined five hundred dollars per violation.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 12.